src/fst/morphology/affixes/nouns.lexc
LEXICON BUDEITA !!≈ * **@CODE@** Rather special word: buđeita
 :a%> GOAHTICMP ;
 +Sg+Nom:a K ;
 +Sg+Nom:a%> NPx3Vflag  ;
 :a%> GOAHTA- ; ! Px sublexicon
 :ta%> GOADI- ; !
 :ta%> GODII- ; !
 :a%> EssV ;
 :ta DenominalAdjsV1 ;
 :ta DenominalNounsV ;
 :ta%> GOADA- ;
 +Sg+Ill:i%>j K ;

LEXICON MANNI !!≈ * **@CODE@** words on -mánni. Long/SHORT nom-compound-forms, long gen.ILL:mánnii/mánnái
 :mánºni MANNI-INFL ;
 +Err/Orth:manºni MANNI-INFL ;
 +Err/Orth:manºne MANNI-INFL ;
! +Err/Orth:mánºne MANNI-INFL ;
! +Err/Orth:manºni MANNI-INFL ;


LEXICON MANNI-INFL !!≈ * **@CODE@**
 :%> GOAHTILONGCMP ;
 :%> GOAHTICMP ;
 +Sg+Nom: K ;
 +Sg+Nom:%> NPx3Vflag  ;
 :%> EssV ;
 :%>X2 GOAHTA- ; ! Px sublexicon
 +Sg+Gen+Err/Orth:%>X4 NPx1V ;
 +Sg+Acc+Err/Orth:%>X4 NPx1V ;
 +Sg+Gen+Err/Orth:%>X6 NPx1V ;
 +Sg+Acc+Err/Orth:%>X6 NPx1V ;
 +Dial/-KJ:%>X3 GOAHTAI ; ! Ill sublexicon
 +Err/Orth:%> GOAHTAI ; ! Ill sublexicon
 +Sg+Ill+Dial/-GG:%>j K ;
 :%>X4 GOADI- ; ! weak grade decl
 ! +Err/Orth:%>X5 GODII- ; ! weak gr dipth simpl
 :%>%^DISIMP GODII- ; ! weak gr dipth simpl
 :%>X6 GOADA- ; ! AG Px
 +Sg+Gen+Use/NG+Allegro:%>X8 K ;  !
 +Cmp/SgGen+Err/Orth:%>X8 R ; !  !Note! Same entry under GOADE-
   DenominalAdjsV1Long ;
!  DenominalAdjsV2 ; not plausible
   DenominalNounsV ;


LEXICON OLLUVUOHTA !!≈ * **@CODE@** Exceptional vuohta-Noun
 : VUOHTAMORPH ; !^B^ vuohtamorph it is


LEXICON LEXMUSH !!≈ * **@CODE@** derived verbs on -muš
 : MUSH ;





!!!!! 2c. lexicas with Incomplete paradigms
! - - - - - - - ---------------------------

LEXICON OLGU !!≈ * **@CODE@** only olgu. Short nom-compound-form, short gen. Incomplete paradigm
 :%> GOAHTICMP ;
 +Sg+Nom: K ;
 +Sg+Nom:%> NPx3Vflag ;
 +Der+Der/viđá+Adv+Use/-PLX:»X7viđá K ;
 +Der+Der/viđi+Adv+Use/-PLX:»X7viđi K ;
 :%> EssV ;
 +Sg+Nom:%>X2 NPx1V ;
 +Sg+Gen:%>X2 NPx1V ;
 +Sg+Acc:%>X2 NPx1V ;
 +Sg+Nom:%>X2 NPx2V ;
! :%>X3 GOAHTAI ; ! Ill sublexicon
 +Sg+Gen:%>X4 K ;
 +Sg+Acc:%>X4 K ;
! +Sg+Gen:%>X4 NPx3V ;
! +Sg+Acc:%>X4 NPx3V ;
! +Sg+Loc:%>X4s K ;
! +Sg+Loc:%>X4n K ; !SUB !SOUTH
! +Sg+Loc:%>X4st%> NPxC ; !^P^
 +Pl+Nom:%>X4t K ;
! +Err/Orth:%>X5 GODII- ; ! weak gr dipth simpl
! :%>%^DISIMP GODII- ; ! weak gr dipth simpl
 +Sg+Com:%>%^DISIMPjn K ;
! +Sg+Com:%>%^DISIMPjn%> NPxC ;
! +Pl+Nom:%>%^DISIMPjd%> NPx1C ;
 +Pl+Gen:%>%^DISIMPjd9 K ;
 +Cmp/PlGen:%>%^DISIMPjd R ;
! +Pl+Gen:%>%^DISIMPjd%> NPxC ;
 +Pl+Acc:%>%^DISIMPjd9 K ;
! +Pl+Acc:%>%^DISIMPjd%> NPxC ;
 +Pl+Ill:%>%^DISIMPjde K ;
! +Pl+Ill:%>%^DISIMPjdasa%> NPxVvowch ;
 +Pl+Loc:%>%^DISIMPjn K ;
 +Pl+Loc+South+Err/Orth:%>%^DISIMPjs K ; ! !SOUTH
! +Pl+Loc:%>%^DISIMPjn%> NPxC ;
 +Pl+Com:%>%^DISIMPjgujn K ;
 +Pl+Com/Sh:%>%^DISIMPj∑- ENDLEX ; !guosai- ja beziiguin
! +Pl+Com:%>%^DISIMPjd%> NPxPlComC ;
! :%>X6 GOADA- ; ! AG Px
 :%>X8 GOADE- ; ! Ditto (?)
 +Cmp/SgGen+Err/Orth:%>X4 R ; !  !Note! Same entry under GOADE-
 +Der2+Der/Comp+A:%>X4b BUStem ;
 +Der2+Der/Superl+A:%>X4muss BUOREMUS ;
!   DenominalAdjsV1Short ;
!   DenominalAdjsV2 ;
!   DenominalNounsV ;

LEXICON MIEHTI !!≈ * **@CODE@** nuorta, nuorti, oarji, miehti. Short nom-compound-forms, long gen. Incomplete paradigm
 :%> GOAHTICMP ;
 +Sg+Nom: K ;
 +Sg+Nom:%> NPx3Vflag ;
 +Der+Der/viđá+Adv+Use/-PLX:»X7viđá K ;
 +Der+Der/viđi+Adv+Use/-PLX:»X7viđi K ;
 :%> EssV ;
! :%>X2 GOAHTA- ; ! Px sublexicon
 +Sg+Gen+Err/Orth:%>X4 NPx1V ;
 +Sg+Acc+Err/Orth:%>X4 NPx1V ;
 +Sg+Gen+Err/Orth:%>X6 NPx1V ;
 +Sg+Acc+Err/Orth:%>X6 NPx1V ;
! :%>X3 GOAHTAI ; ! Ill sublexicon
 +Sg+Gen:%>X4 K ;
 +Sg+Acc:%>X4 K ;
! +Sg+Loc:%>X4s K ;
! +Sg+Loc:%>X4n K ; !SUB !SOUTH
! +Pl+Nom:%>X4t K ;
! +Err/Orth:%>X5 GODII- ; ! weak gr dipth simpl
! :%>%^DISIMP GODII- ; ! weak gr dipth simpl
 +Sg+Com:%>%^DISIMPjn K ;
! +Sg+Com:%>%^DISIMPjn%> NPxC ;
! +Pl+Nom:%>%^DISIMPjd%> NPx1C ;
! +Pl+Gen:%>%^DISIMPjd9 K ;
! +Cmp/PlGen:%>%^DISIMPjd R ;
! +Pl+Gen:%>%^DISIMPjd%> NPxC ;
! +Pl+Acc:%>%^DISIMPjd9 K ;
! +Pl+Acc:%>%^DISIMPjd%> NPxC ;
! +Pl+Ill:%>%^DISIMPjde K ;
! +Pl+Ill:%>%^DISIMPjdasa%> NPxVvowch ;
! +Pl+Loc:%>%^DISIMPjn K ;
! +Pl+Loc+South+Err/Orth:%>%^DISIMPjs K ; ! !SOUTH
! +Pl+Loc:%>%^DISIMPjn%> NPxC ;
! +Pl+Com:%>%^DISIMPjgujn K ;
! +Pl+Com/Sh:%>%^DISIMPj∑- ENDLEX ; !guosai- ja beziiguin
 +Cmp/SgGen+Err/Orth:%>X8 R ; !  !Note! Same entry under GOADE-
! +Pl+Com:%>%^DISIMPjd%> NPxPlComC ;
! :%>X6 GOADA- ; ! AG Px
! +Sg+Gen:%>X8 K ;  ! ^NG^
!   DenominalAdjsV1Long ;
!   DenominalAdjsV2 ;
!   DenominalNounsV ;

LEXICON LULLI !!≈ * **@CODE@** lulli and davvi. Long/SHORT nom-compound-forms, long gen. Incomplete paradigm
 :%> GOAHTILONGCMP ;
 :%> GOAHTICMP ;
 +Sg+Nom: K ;
 +Sg+Nom:%> NPx3Vflag ;
 +Der+Der/viđá+Adv+Use/-PLX:»X7viđá K ;
 +Der+Der/viđi+Adv+Use/-PLX:»X7viđi K ;
 :%> EssV ;
 +Sg+Nom:%>X2 NPx1V ;
 +Sg+Gen:%>X2 NPx1V ;
 +Sg+Acc:%>X2 NPx1V ;
 +Sg+Nom:%>X2 NPx2V ;
! :%>X3 GOAHTAI ; ! Ill sublexicon
 +Sg+Gen:%>X4 K ;
 +Sg+Acc:%>X4 K ;
! +Sg+Gen:%>X4 NPx3V ;
! +Sg+Acc:%>X4 NPx3V ;
! +Sg+Loc:%>X4s K ;
! +Sg+Loc:%>X4n K ; !SUB !SOUTH
! +Sg+Loc:%>X4st%> NPxC ; !^P^
! +Pl+Nom:%>X4t K ;
! +Err/Orth:%>X5 GODII- ; ! weak gr dipth simpl
! :%>%^DISIMP GODII- ; ! weak gr dipth simpl
 +Sg+Com:%>%^DISIMPjn K ;
! +Sg+Com:%>%^DISIMPjn%> NPxC ;
! +Pl+Nom:%>%^DISIMPjd%> NPx1C ;
! +Pl+Gen:%>%^DISIMPjd9 K ;
! +Cmp/PlGen:%>%^DISIMPjd R ;
! +Pl+Gen:%>%^DISIMPjd%> NPxC ;
! +Pl+Acc:%>%^DISIMPjd9 K ;
! +Pl+Acc:%>%^DISIMPjd%> NPxC ;
! +Pl+Ill:%>%^DISIMPjde K ;
! +Pl+Ill:%>%^DISIMPjdasa%> NPxVvowch ;
! +Pl+Loc:%>%^DISIMPjn K ;
! +Pl+Loc+South+Err/Orth:%>%^DISIMPjs K ; ! !SOUTH
! +Pl+Loc:%>%^DISIMPjn%> NPxC ;
! +Pl+Com:%>%^DISIMPjgujn K ;
 +Pl+Com/Sh:%>%^DISIMPj∑- ENDLEX ; !guosai- ja beziiguin
 +Cmp/SgGen+Err/Orth:%>X8 R ; !  !Note! Same entry under GOADE-
! +Pl+Com:%>%^DISIMPjd%> NPxPlComC ;
! :%>X6 GOADA- ; ! AG Px
! +Sg+Gen:%>X8 K ;  ! ^NG^
!   DenominalAdjsV1Long ;
!   DenominalAdjsV2 ;
!   DenominalNounsV ;



!!!!! 2d. nouns with comparatives
! - - - - - - - -----------------

LEXICON GADDI !!≈ * **@CODE@** Bisyll. V-Nouns with Comparative Forms.  Short nom-compound-forms, long gen.
 +Sg+Nom: K ;
 +Sg+Nom:%> NPx3Vflag ;
 +Cmp/SgNom:%>X7 flagON-R ;
 +Cmp/SgNom:%> flagOFF-R ;
 +Der+Der/viđá+Adv+Use/-PLX:»X7viđá K ;
 +Der+Der/viđi+Adv+Use/-PLX:»X7viđi K ;
 +Ess:%>n K ;
 +Ess:%>n%> NPxC ;
 :%>X2 GOAHTA- ; ! Px sublexicon
 +Sg+Gen+Err/Orth:%>X4 NPx1V ;
 +Sg+Acc+Err/Orth:%>X4 NPx1V ;
 +Sg+Gen+Err/Orth:%>X6 NPx1V ;
 +Sg+Acc+Err/Orth:%>X6 NPx1V ;
 :%>X3 GOAHTAI ; ! Ill sublexicon
 +Err/Orth:%> GOAHTAI ; ! Ill sublexicon
 :%>X4 GOADI- ; ! weak grade decl
 ! +Err/Orth:%>X5 GODII- ; ! weak gr dipth simpl
 :%>%^DISIMP GODII- ; ! weak gr dipth simpl
 :%>X6 GOADA- ; ! AG Px
 +Cmp/SgGen+Err/Orth:%>X8 R ; !  !Note! Same entry under GOADE-
! :%> GOAHTE- ;
 +Der2+Der/Comp+A:%>X4b BUStem ;
 +Der2+Der/Superl+A:%>X4muss BUOREMUS ;
   DenominalNounsV ;
   DenominalAdjsV1Long ;
!   DenominalAdjsV2 ;

LEXICON GADDILONG !!≈ * **@CODE@** long compound forms, short -heapme
 :%> GOAHTILONGCMP ;
 +Sg+Nom: K ;
 +Sg+Nom:%> NPx3Vflag ;
 +Der+Der/viđá+Adv+Use/-PLX:»viđá K ;
 +Der+Der/viđi+Adv+Use/-PLX:»viđi K ;
 :%> EssV ;
 :%>X2 GOAHTA- ; ! Px sublexicon
 +Sg+Gen+Err/Orth:%>X4 NPx1V ;
 +Sg+Acc+Err/Orth:%>X4 NPx1V ;
 +Sg+Gen+Err/Orth:%>X6 NPx1V ;
 +Sg+Acc+Err/Orth:%>X6 NPx1V ;
 :%>X3 GOAHTAI ; ! Ill sublexicon
 +Err/Orth:%> GOAHTAI ; ! Ill sublexicon
 :%>X4 GOADI- ; ! weak grade decl
 ! +Err/Orth:%>X5 GODII- ; ! weak gr dipth simpl
 :%>%^DISIMP GODII- ; ! weak gr dipth simpl
 :%>X6 GOADA- ; ! AG Px
 +Cmp/SgGen+Err/Orth:%>X8 R ; !  !Note! Same entry under GOADE-
 +Der2+Der/Comp+A:%>X4b BUStem ;
 +Der2+Der/Superl+A:%>X4muss BUOREMUS ;
!   DenominalAdjsV1Short ;
!   DenominalAdjsV2 ;
!   DenominalNounsV ;
