src/fst/morphology/stems/nouns.lexc
LEXICON NounNoPx   !!= * **@CODE@** here goes nouns not taking Px.
bodni+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Plc:bodni GADDI ;
bodni+N+Sem/Plc+Err/Orth:botni GADDI ;
borga+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Wthr:borºga GADDI ;
davvenuorta+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Plc:davve#nuorºta MIEHTI ;
davvenuorti+N+CmpNP/None+Sem/Plc:davve#nuorºti MIEHTI ;
davveoarji+N+CmpN/SgN+Sem/Plc:davve#oarºji MIEHTI ;
davvinuorta+N+Sem/Dummytag:davvi#nuorºta MIEHTI ;
lulleoarji+N+CmpN/SgN+Sem/Dummytag:lulle#oarºji MIEHTI ;
lullioarji+N+CmpN/SgN+Sem/Dummytag:lulli#oarºji MIEHTI ;
lullenuorta+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Plc:lulle#nuorºta MIEHTI ;
lullinuorta+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Plc:lulli#nuorºta MIEHTI ;
lullenuorti+N+Sem/Dummytag:lulle#nuorºti MIEHTI ;
lullinuorti+N+Sem/Dummytag:lulli#nuorºti MIEHTI ;
miehti+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Plc:miehºti MIEHTI ;
máttanuorti+N+CmpNP/None+Sem/Plc:mátta#nuorºti MIEHTI ;
máttaoarji+N+CmpN/SgN+Sem/Plc:mátta#oarºji MIEHTI ;
olgu+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Plc:olºgu OLGU ;
tillitsmánni+N+Err/Lex+Use/LIA+Sem/Hum:tillits# MANNI ; !LIA
LEXICON NounPx  !!= * **@CODE@** this is the main noun lexicon
Deanusoahpamuš+N+Sem/Txt:Deanu#soahpamušš LEXMUSH ;
bargosadjecealkámuš+N+Sem/Dummytag:bargo#sadje#cealkámušš LEXMUSH ;
bearremánni+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum:bearre# MANNI ;
bissehansoahpamuš+N+Sem/Prod-ling:bissehan#soahpamušš LEXMUSH ;
boaššu+N+CmpN/SgN+Sem/Plc:boašºšu GADDI ;
bosmánni+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum:bos# MANNI ;
buhtadusohcamuš+N+Sem/Txt:buhtadus#ohcamušš LEXMUSH ;
buđeita+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+Sem/Fruit:buđeit BUDEITA ;
buđeita+N+Err/Orth+Sem/Fruit:buđeait BUDEITA ;
bázaoažžumuš+N+Sem/Dummytag:báza#oažžumušš LEXMUSH ;
divvumuš+N+Sem/Dummytag:divvumušš LEXMUSH ;
dánamánni+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum:dána# MANNI ;
dáruidahttináigumuš+N+Sem/Prod-cogn:dáruidahttin#áigumušš LEXMUSH ;
figgamuš+N+Sem/Dummytag:figgamušš LEXMUSH ;
fylkkamánni+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum_Pos:fylkka# MANNI ;
fylkkamánni+N+Err/Orth+Sem/Hum_Pos:filka# MANNI ;
fylkkamánni+N+Err/Orth+Sem/Hum_Pos:filkka# MANNI ;
fylkkamánni+N+Err/Orth-nom-gen+Sem/Hum_Pos:fylka# MANNI ;
fávli+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Plc_Time:fávºli GADDI ;
genddomuš+N+Sem/Dummytag:genddomušš LEXMUSH ;
guolleborramuš+N+Sem/Food:guolle#borramušš LEXMUSH ;
guovlluleansmánni+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum_Pos:guovllu#leans# MANNI ;
guovlluleansmánni+N+Err/Orth-nom-gen+Sem/Hum_Pos:guovlu#leans# MANNI ;
heavsmánni+N+Sem/Hum_Pos+Err/Orth:hevs# MANNI ;
husmánni+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum:hus# MANNI ;
investerenáigumuš+N+Sem/Prod-cogn:investeren#áigumušš LEXMUSH ;
lahttoohcamuš+N+Sem/Txt:lahtto#ohcamušš LEXMUSH ;
leansmánni+N+Err/Orth+Sem/Hum_Pos:lens# MANNI ;
loaidu+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Plc:loajºdu GADDI ;
loažži+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Wthr:loažži GADDI ;
lávderavda+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Plc:lávde#ravºda GADDI ;
mearra+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+Sem/Plc:mearra GADDI ;
muhttámuš+N+Sem/Dummytag:muhttámušš LEXMUSH ;
muoddáleansmánni+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum_Pos:muoddá#leans# MANNI ;
namsmánni+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum_Pos:nams# MANNI ;
nealgi+N+Sem/Perc-phys:nealºgi GADDI ;
nuortadavvi+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Plc:nuorta#davvi LULLI ;
nuortalulli+N+Sem/Dummytag:nuorta#lulli LULLI ;
oarjedavvi+N+Sem/Dummytag:oarje#davvi LULLI ;
oarjelulli+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Plc:oarje#lulli LULLI ;
oktasašbargosoahpamuš+N+Sem/Prod-ling:oktasaš#bargo#soahpamušš LEXMUSH ;
olluvuohta+N+CmpN/SgG+Sem/Feat:olluvuohºta OLLUVUOHTA "plentyness N" ;
orjješdavvi+N+Err/Orth+Sem/Dummytag:oarješ#davvi LULLI ;
orjješdavvi+N+Sem/Dummytag:orjješ#davvi LULLI ;
orjješlulli+N+Sem/Dummytag:orjješ#lulli LULLI ;
rasismacealkámuš+N+Sem/Prod-ling:rasisma#cealkámušš LEXMUSH ;
ravda+N+Sem/Dummytag:ravºda GADDI ;
ravda+N+Sem/Dummytag+Err/Orth-a-á:rávºda GADDI ;
servvodatbargamuš+N+Sem/Dummytag:servvodat#bargamušš LEXMUSH ;
siski+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Plc:sisºki GADDI ;
soggi+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Plc:soggi GADDI ;
stivremánni+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum:stivre# MANNI ;
sáhkkocealkámuš+N+Sem/Prod-ling:sáhkko#cealkámušš LEXMUSH ;
uksa+N+Sem/Buildpart:ukºsa GADDI ;
uski+N+Sem/Dummytag:usºki GADDI ;
vihtancealkámuš+N+Sem/Prod-ling:vihtan#cealkámušš LEXMUSH ;
vuotna+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Plc:vuotna GADDI ;
váldoámtamánni+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum_Pos:váldo#ámta# MANNI ;
álgoboahtimuš+N+Sem/Dummytag:álgo#boahti7mušš LEXMUSH ;
ámtamánni+N+Err/Orth-nom-gen+Sem/Hum_Pos:ámtta# MANNI ;
